Illinois, session 104th, HB307.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-14-3 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-14-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-3)7    Sec. 3-14-3. Parole services. To assist parolees or 8releasees, the the Department shall provide employment 9counseling and job placement services, and may in addition to 10other services provide the following:11        (1) assistance in residential placement;12        (2) family and individual counseling and treatment 13    placement;14        (3) financial counseling;15        (4) vocational and educational counseling and 16    placement; and17        (5) referral services to any other State or local 18    agencies. The Department shall make information about the 19    availability of these services known to a parolee or 20    releasee prior to his or her release from the correctional 21    facility where the parolee or releasee has been residing. 22    The Department may purchase necessary services for a 23    parolee or releasee if they are otherwise unavailable and   HB0307- 2 -LRB104 04153 RLC 14177 b1    the parolee or releasee is unable to pay for them. It may 2    assess all or part of the costs of such services to a 3    parolee or releasee in accordance with his ability to pay 4    for them.5(Source: P.A. 102-478, eff. 8-20-21.)